Utah statutes.
31A-22-724.   Offer of alternative coverage -- Utah NetCare Plan.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "alternative coverage" means:

(a)  a high deductible or low deductible Utah NetCare Plan described in Subsection (2) for a conversion health benefit plan policy offered under Section 31A-22-723; and

(b)  a high deductible and low deductible Utah NetCare Plans described in Subsection (2) as an alternative to COBRA and mini-COBRA health benefit plan coverage offered under Section 31A-22-722.

(2)  A Utah NetCare Plan under this section is subject to Section 31A-2-212 and shall, except when prohibited by federal law, include:

(a)  healthy lifestyle and wellness incentives;

(b)  the benefits described in this Subsection (2) or at least the actuarial equivalent of the benefits described in this Subsection (2);

(c)  a lifetime maximum benefit per person of not less than $1,000,000;

(d)  an annual maximum benefit per person of not less than $250,000;

(e)  the following deductibles:

(i)  for a low deductible plan:

(A)  $2,000 for an individual plan;

(B)  $4,000 for a two party plan; and

(C)  $6,000 for a family plan;

(ii)  for a high deductible plan:

(A)  $4,000 for an individual plan;

(B)  $8,000 for a two party plan; and

(C)  $12,000 for a family plan;

(f)  the following out-of-pocket maximum costs, including deductibles, copayments, and coinsurance:

(i)  for a low deductible plan:

(A)  $5,000 for an individual plan;

(B)  $10,000 for a two party plan; and

(C)  $15,000 for a family plan; and

(ii)  for a high deductible plan:

(A)  $10,000 for an individual plan;

(B)  $20,000 for a two party plan; and

(C)  $30,000 for a family plan;

(g)  the following benefits before applying a deductible requirement and in accordance with Section 223, Internal Revenue Code, and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-13:

(i)  all well child exams and immunizations up to age five, with no annual maximum;

(ii)  preventive care up to a $500 annual maximum;

(iii)  primary care and specialist and urgent care not covered under Subsection (2)(g)(i) or (ii) up to a $300 annual maximum; and

(iv)  supplemental accident coverage up to a $500 annual maximum;

(h)  the following copayments for each exam:

(i)  $15 for preventive care and well child exams;

(ii)  $25 for primary care; and

(iii)  $50 for urgent care and specialist care;

(i)  a $200 copayment for an emergency room visit after applying the deductible;

(j)  no more than a 30% coinsurance after deductible for covered plan benefits for:

(i)  hospital services;

(ii)  maternity;

(iii)  laboratory work;

(iv)  x-rays;

(v)  radiology;

(vi)  outpatient surgery services;

(vii)  injectable medications not otherwise covered under a pharmacy benefit;

(viii)  durable medical equipment;

(ix)  ambulance services;

(x)  in-patient mental health services; and

(xi)  out-patient mental health services; and

(k)  the following cost-sharing features for a prescription drug:

(i)  up to a $15 copayment for a generic drug; and

(ii)  up to a 50% coinsurance for a name brand drug.

(3)  A Utah NetCare Plan may exclude:

(a)  the benefit mandates described in Subsections 31A-22-618.5(2)(b) and (3)(b); and

(b)  unless required by federal law, mandated coverage required by the following sections and related administrative rules:

(i)  Section 31A-22-610.1, Adoption indemnity benefit;

(ii)  Section 31A-22-623, Coverage of inborn metabolic errors;

(iii)  Section 31A-22-624, Primary care physician;

(iv)  Section 31A-22-626, Coverage of diabetes;

(v)  Section 31A-22-628, Standing referral to a specialist; and

(vi)  a mandated coverage enacted after January 1, 2009, that is not required by federal law.

(4)  A Utah NetCare Plan may include a formulary or preferred drug list.

(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (6), a person may elect alternative coverage under this section if the person is eligible for:

(i)  continuation of employer group health benefit plan coverage under federal COBRA laws;

(ii)  continuation of employer group health benefit plan coverage under state mini-COBRA under Section 31A-22-722; or

(iii)  a conversion to an individual health benefit plan after the exhaustion of benefits under:

(A)  alternative coverage elected in place of federal COBRA; or

(B)  state mini-COBRA under Section 31A-22-722.

(b)  The right to extend coverage under Subsection (5)(a) applies to spouse or dependent coverages, including a surviving spouse or dependent whose coverage under the policy terminates by reason of the death of the employee or member.

(6)  If a person elects federal COBRA or state mini-COBRA health benefit plan coverage under Section 31A-22-722, the person is not eligible to elect alternative coverage under this section until the person is eligible to convert coverage to an individual policy under Section 31A-22-723 and Subsection (1)(a).

(7) (a) (i)  If alternative coverage is selected as an alternative to COBRA or mini-COBRA health benefit plan coverage under Section 31A-22-722, Section 31A-22-722 applies to the alternative coverage.

(ii)  If an employee of a small employer selects alternative coverage as an alternative to COBRA or mini-COBRA health benefit plan coverage, the insurer may not use a risk factor greater than the employer's most current risk factor for purposes of Subsection 31A-22-722(5).

(b)  If alternative coverage is selected as a conversion policy under Section 31A-22-723, Section 31A-22-723 applies.

(8)  The commissioner shall adopt administrative rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to develop a model letter for employers to use to notify an employee of the employee's options for alternative coverage.

